Utah statutes.
26-2-18.5.   Rendering a dead body unavailable for postmortem investigation.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Medical examiner" is as defined in Section 26-4-2.

(b)  "Unavailable for postmortem investigation" is as defined in Section 26-4-2.

(2)  It is unlawful for a person to engage in any conduct that makes a dead body unavailable for postmortem investigation, unless, before engaging in that conduct, the person obtains a permit from the medical examiner to render the dead body unavailable for postmortem investigation, under Section 26-4-29.

(3)  A person who violates Subsection (2) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(4)  If a person engages in conduct that constitutes both a violation of this section and a violation of Section 76-9-704, the provisions and penalties of Section 76-9-704 supercede the provisions and penalties of this section.

